fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON waciy-
waciy-/:waciy/ -is "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=2/21 [12/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ -isk- "weight: 26.166043" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ -iskâ "weight: 26.166043" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ -iwan "weight: 26.166043" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ -iwi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/21 [1/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ -iwi2 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/21 [2/145429]
waciy-+Der/N:waciy NI "weight: 16.404867" ; ! n=6/21 (NI-2) [47/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ iw "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/21 [1/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ w "weight: 25.472896" ; ! n=2/21 [0/145429]
waciy-/:waciy/ wâskâ- "weight: 20.100864" ; ! n=1/21 [7/145429]

LEXICON wacêhkam-
wacêhkam-/:wacêhkam/ -isi "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/8 [0/145429]
wacêhkam-/:wacêhkam/ -êýi- "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/8 [0/145429]
wacêhkam-/:wacêhkam/ -êýiht "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
wacêhkam-/:wacêhkam/ -êýim "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/8 [0/145429]

LEXICON wahakay-
wahakay-+Der/N:wahakay NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON wahkê-
wahkê-/:wahkê/ -ahp- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/19 [2/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ -ahpinê "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/19 [2/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ -m1 "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=2/19 [0/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ -mo "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=2/19 [0/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ pôm- "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=2/19 [0/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ pômê- "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=2/19 [0/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ w "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=6/19 [2/145429]
wahkê-/:wahkê/ y "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=1/19 [0/145429]

LEXICON wahotêw-
wahotêw-+Der/N:wahotêw NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON wahýakay-
wahýakay-+Der/N:wahýakay NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON wan2-
wan2-/:wan/ -sk2 "weight: 13.949652" ; ! n=15/15 [219/145429]

LEXICON wanaskw-
wanaskw-/:wanaskw/ -cihc- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/3 [1/145429]
wanaskw-/:wanaskw/ -cihcân "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/3 [1/145429]

LEXICON wanihik-
wanihik-/:wanihik/ -amaw "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/20 [4/145429]
wanihik-/:wanihik/ -an2 "weight: 17.076961" ; ! n=9/20 [16/145429]
wanihik-/:wanihik/ -ê2 "weight: 16.608695" ; ! n=10/20 [23/145429]

LEXICON wanihikan-
wanihikan-/:wanihikan/ -i2 "weight: 27.641950" ; ! n=1/9 [0/145429]
wanihikan-/:wanihikan/ -is "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/9 [1/145429]
wanihikan-/:wanihikan/ -ê2 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/9 [4/145429]
wanihikan-+Der/N:wanihikan3 NI "weight: 17.857119" ; ! n=6/9 (NI-1) [11/145429]

LEXICON waniskâ-
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -n1 "weight: 16.482253" ; ! n=9/17 [29/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -pahtâ "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/17 [5/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -paýiho "weight: 25.025467" ; ! n=1/17 [0/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -piT "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/17 [2/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -pit "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/17 [1/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -skw1- "weight: 25.025467" ; ! n=1/17 [0/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -w2 "weight: 25.025467" ; ! n=1/17 [0/145429]
waniskâ-/:waniskâ/ -win "weight: 25.025467" ; ! n=1/17 [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@waniskâ-+Der/V:@R.class.AI@waniskâ VAI-ae "weight: 16.842767" ; ! n=1/17 (VAI-1) [182/145429]

LEXICON wanâ-
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -h "weight: 17.482426" ; ! n=6/15 [16/145429]
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -ht2 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/15 [1/145429]
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -m1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/15 [1/145429]
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -mo "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -pit "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]
wanâ-/:wanâ/ -t1 "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/15 [0/145429]

LEXICON wanât-
wanât-/:wanât/ -paýi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/5 [1/145429]
wanât-/:wanât/ -î1 "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
wanât-/:wanât/ ap- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/5 [1/145429]
wanât-/:wanât/ api- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/5 [1/145429]
wanât-/:wanât/ wêp- "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]

LEXICON wap-
wap-/:wap/ -â1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/3 [1/145429]

LEXICON wapâ-
wapâ-/:wapâ/ -sin2 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
wapâ-/:wapâ/ -w1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/3 [1/145429]
@R.class.II@wapâ-+Der/V:@R.class.II@wapâ VII-v "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 (VII-2v) [0/145429]

LEXICON wasaskwêtow-
wasaskwêtow-+Der/N:wasaskwêtow NI "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/2 (NI-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON wask-
wask-/:wask/ -akocin2 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
wask-/:wask/ -htin1 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
wask-/:wask/ -n1 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
wask-/:wask/ -pit "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/6 [3/145429]
wask-/:wask/ -î1 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/6 [2/145429]
wask-/:wask/ akot2- "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]

LEXICON waskatamow-
waskatamow-+Der/N:waskatamow NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NI-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON waskaw-
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -n1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/40 [1/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -paýi "weight: 19.156402" ; ! n=6/40 [3/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -paýih "weight: 25.048563" ; ! n=2/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -paýiht "weight: 25.741710" ; ! n=1/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -paýihtâ "weight: 25.741710" ; ! n=1/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -paýin "weight: 25.741710" ; ! n=1/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -piT "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/40 [2/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -pit "weight: 25.048563" ; ! n=2/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -âkam- "weight: 25.741710" ; ! n=1/40 [0/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ -î1 "weight: 14.812597" ; ! n=14/40 [99/145429]
waskaw-/:waskaw/ wêp- "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=6/40 [2/145429]

LEXICON waskit-
waskit-/:waskit/ -askisin "weight: 27.775481" ; ! n=2/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -asâkay "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/32 [2/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -atêwê- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -ciw- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -ciwan "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -paýi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/32 [1/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -paýin "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -piT "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -pit "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/32 [1/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -pê "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/32 [1/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -pêk- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -sin1 "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -skw2- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ -âkon- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/32 [1/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ ah- "weight: 27.370016" ; ! n=3/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ akot1- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/32 [1/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ anâsk- "weight: 27.775481" ; ! n=2/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ ap- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ api- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ ast- "weight: 27.370016" ; ! n=3/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ astâ- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
waskit-/:waskit/ astê- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]

LEXICON waskow-
waskow-/:waskow/ -an1 "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
waskow-+Der/N:waskow NI "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-2) [20/145429]

LEXICON waskway-
waskway-/:waskway/ -i "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -isk- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -iskâ "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -kamikw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/13 [1/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -waT "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=1/13 [8/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -âhtikw "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/13 [1/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -âpoy "weight: 20.100864" ; ! n=1/13 [7/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ -ýâkan "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-+Der/N:waskway NA "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=1/13 (NA-2) [30/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ oý- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ oýâkan- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
waskway-/:waskway/ ôs- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]

LEXICON waskwêtoy-
waskwêtoy-+Der/N:waskwêtoy NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 waciy- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=6/27654 [25/145429]
0 wacêhkam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [0/145429]
0 wahakay- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 wahkê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=13/27654 [4/145429]
0 wahotêw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 wahýakay- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 wan2- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=15/27654 [219/145429]
0 wanaskw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [1/145429]
0 wanihik- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=7/27654 [36/145429]
0 wanihikan- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [10/145429]
0 waniskâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=15/27654 [219/145429]
0 wanâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=14/27654 [18/145429]
0 wanât- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=4/27654 [2/145429]
0 wap- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [1/145429]
0 wapâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [1/145429]
0 wasaskwêtow- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 wask- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [5/145429]
0 waskatamow- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 waskaw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=32/27654 [104/145429]
0 waskit- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=28/27654 [7/145429]
0 waskow- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [20/145429]
0 waskway- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=11/27654 [47/145429]
0 waskwêtoy- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
LEXICON nât-
nât-/:nât/ wanihik- "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/133 [4/145429]
nât-/:nât/ wanihikan- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/133 [4/145429]
LEXICON o1-
o1-/:o/ wanihik- "weight: 23.736196" ; ! n=1/251 [0/145429]
o1-/:o/ wanihikan- "weight: 23.736196" ; ! n=1/251 [0/145429]
LEXICON o2-
o2-/:o/ wanihik- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/392 [1/145429]
o2-/:o/ waniskâ- "weight: 23.368762" ; ! n=1/392 [0/145429]
